Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Chapter 34. In-State Natural Gas Pipeline.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and a statement of legislative purpose applicable to the 2010 enactment of this chapter, see § 1, ch. 7, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 38.34.010.
In-state gasline project coordinator.

The position of in-state gasline project coordinator is created in the Office of the Governor. The Office of the Governor shall provide administrative support for the position. The position shall continue until one year after commencement of commercial operation of the in-state natural gas pipeline.

The governor shall appoint an individual to the position of in-state gasline project coordinator. The coordinator is in the exempt service under AS

39.25.110

. The person serving as the in-state gasline project coordinator may be removed from the position at the discretion of the governor, who shall appoint another person to the position.

The in-state gasline project coordinator shall collaborate with other state agencies or entities to coordinate and facilitate the provisions of AS

31.25.007

and AS

38.34.020

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 7 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2014, a reference to AS

31.25.007

was added to (c) of this section to reflect the renumbering of AS

38.34.020(a)

as AS

31.25.007

.

Sec. 38.34.020.
Expedited construction and operation or expansion of an Alaska Gasline Development Corporation project.

[Renumbered as AS

31.25.007

.]

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, a state agency or entity may not include in any project certificate, right-of-way, permit, or other authorization a term or condition that is not required by law if the in-state gasline project coordinator determines that the term or condition would prevent or impair, in any significant respect, the expeditious construction and operation or expansion of a project under AS 31.25 (Alaska Gasline Development Corporation).

Unless required by law, a state agency or entity may not add to, amend, or abrogate any certificate, right-of-way, permit, or other authorization if the in-state gasline project coordinator determines that the action would prevent or impair, in any significant respect, the expeditious construction, operation, or expansion of a project under AS 31.25 (Alaska Gasline Development Corporation).

History.

(§ 4 ch 7 SLA 2010; am §§ 35, 36 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, in (b), and (c), substituted “a project under AS 31.25 (Alaska Gasline Development Corporation)” for “the In-state natural gas pipeline project”.

Secs. 38.34.030 — 38.34.060.
Joint In-State Gasline Development Team; duties of the development team; cooperation and access to information; conflicts of interest. [Repealed, § 23 ch 11 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 38.34.099.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“Alaska Gasline Development Corporation” means the corporation created under AS

31.25.010

;

“in-state natural gas pipeline” and “natural gas pipeline” have the meanings given in AS

31.25.390

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 7 SLA 2010; am § 7 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 22, 2013, rewrote the section, which read, “In this chapter,

“(1) ‘in-state natural gas pipeline’ means a pipeline for transporting natural gas that runs from the North Slope to tidewater in the state;

“(2) ‘North Slope’ means that area of Alaska lying north of 68 degrees North latitude.”